Utah statutes.
63H-2-202.   Authority board.
(1)  There is created the Utah Generated Renewable Energy Electricity Network
Authority Board that consists of seven members, appointed by the governor as
follows:
(a)  one member from the Governor's Office of Economic Development;
(b)  three members from a public utility or electric interlocal entity that
operates electric transmission facilities within the state as follows:
(i)  one member selected by the governor from recommendations from an
investor-owned electric corporation that operates in this state;
(ii)  one member selected by the governor from recommendations from a
wholesale electrical cooperative in the state; and
(iii)  one member selected by the governor from recommendations from an
electric interlocal entity;
(c) the director of the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration
created in Section 53C-1-201;
(d)  one representative of a business entity that produces a renewable energy
source; and
(e)  one member of the general public.
(2) (a)  The term of a board member is four years.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), the governor shall, at the time of
appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the
terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the board
is appointed every two years.
(c)  The governor may remove a member of the board for cause.
(d)  The governor shall fill a vacancy in the board in the same manner under
this section as the appointment of the member whose vacancy is being filled.
(e)  An individual appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve the remaining
unexpired term of the member whose vacancy the individual is filling.
(f)  A board member shall serve until a successor is appointed and qualified.
(3)  The board member appointed under Subsection (1)(a) shall serve as chair
of the board.
(4) (a)  Four members of the board is a quorum for conducting board business.
(b)  A majority vote of the quorum present is required for an action to be
taken by the board.
(5) (a)  The board shall meet at least quarterly on a date the board sets.
(b)  The chair of the board or any two members of the board may call
additional meetings.
(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
